Illinois, session 104th, SB3992.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Research, Education, and Government Operations Protection Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to protect 7Illinois' research, educational system, and government 8operations from malicious influence from foreign countries of 9concern. 10    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:11    "Affiliate organization" means an entity under the control 12of or established for the benefit of an organization required 13to report under the Act, including a direct-support 14organization. 15    "Agreement" means a written or spoken statement of mutual 16interest in cultural exchange or academic or research 17collaboration.18    "Country of concern" means the People's Republic of China, 19the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of Iran, the 20Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the Republic of Cuba, 21the Venezuelan regime of Nicolás Maduro, the Syrian Arab 22Republic, a foreign terrorist organization as designated by   SB3992- 2 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1the Secretary of State under Section 219 of the Immigration 2and Naturalization Act (8 U.S.C. 1189), including an agent of 3or any other entity under significant control of such an 4entity, or any other entity declared by the Governor to be a 5"country of concern" after consultation with the Director of 6the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 7Homeland Security.8    "Direct-support organization" means an organization that 9is organized and operated to receive, hold, invest, and 10administer property and to make expenditures to or for the 11benefit of an institution of higher education or for the 12benefit of a research and development park or research and 13development authority affiliated with an institution of higher 14education.15    "Executive Inspector General" means the Executive 16Inspector General for the Agencies of the Illinois Governor.17    "Foreign agent" means an officer, employee, proxy, 18servant, delegate, or representative of a foreign government. 19    "Foreign government" means the government of a country, 20nation, or group of nations, or a province or other political 21subdivision of a country or nation, including an agent of the 22government, other than the government of the United States. 23    "Foreign instrumentality" means an agency, bureau, 24ministry, component, institution, association or a legal, 25commercial, or business organization, corporation, firm, or 26entity that is substantially owned, controlled, sponsored,   SB3992- 3 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1commanded, managed, or dominated by a foreign government. 2    "Foreign source" means any of the following:3        (1) A foreign government or an agency of a foreign 4    government.5        (2) A legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created 6    solely under the laws of a foreign state or states.7        (3) An individual who is not a citizen or a national of 8    the United States or a territory or protectorate of the 9    United States.10        (4) A partnership, association, corporation, 11    organization, or any other combination of persons 12    organized under the laws of or having its principal place 13    of business in a country of concern or subsidiary of such 14    entity.15        (5) An agent, including a subsidiary or an affiliate 16    organization of a foreign legal entity, acting on behalf 17    of a foreign government or foreign instrumentality. 18        (6) A political party or member of a political party. 19    For the purposes of this paragraph, "political party" 20    means an organization or combination of individuals whose 21    aim or purpose is, or who is engaged in an activity devoted 22    in whole or in part to, the establishment, administration, 23    control, or acquisition of administration or control of a 24    government of a country of concern or a subdivision 25    thereof, or the furtherance or influencing of the 26    political or public interest, policies, or relations of a   SB3992- 4 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    government of a country of concern of subdivision thereof.2    "Gift" means money or property of any kind voluntarily 3transferred, granted, endowed, awarded, donated, or any 4combination thereof, including a conditional or unconditional 5pledge of a voluntarily transfer, endowment, award, or 6donation. As used in this definition, "pledge" means a 7promise, an agreement, or an expressed intention to give a 8gift, and "grant" means a transfer of money for a specified 9purpose, including a conditional gift. 10    "Institution of higher education" means a public 11institution of higher education, as that term is defined in 12Section 5 of the Public Higher Education Act.13    "Institution of K-12 education" means a public school, as 14that term is defined in Section 1-3 of the School Code. 15    "Obtain or use" means any manner of:16        (A) taking or exercising unlawful control over 17    property; 18        (B) making an unauthorized use, disposition, or 19    transfer of property;20        (C) obtaining property by fraud, willful 21    misrepresentation of a future act, or false promise; or22        (D) conduct generally known as stealing; larceny, 23    purloining, abstracting, embezzlement, misapplication, 24    misappropriation, conversion, or obtaining money or 25    property by false pretenses, fraud, or deception or other 26    conduct similar in nature.   SB3992- 5 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    "Partnership" means, as used in Section 15, a faculty or 2student exchange program, a study-abroad program, a 3matriculation program, a recruiting program, or a dual degree 4program. 5    "Person" means a natural person, corporation, business 6trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, 7government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other 8legal or commercial entity. 9    "State agency or political subdivision" means an agency or 10unit of the State or a unit of local government created or 11established by law.12    "Trade secret" means the whole or a portion or phase of a 13formula, pattern, device, combination of devices, or 14compilation of information which is for use, or is used, in the 15operation of a business and which provides the business an 16advantage, or an opportunity to obtain an advantage, over 17those who do not know or use it. "Trade secret" includes 18scientific, technical, or commercial information, including 19financial information, and includes a design, process, 20procedure, list of suppliers, list of customers, business 21code, or improvement thereof, whether tangible or intangible, 22and regardless of whether or how it is stored, compiled, or 23memorialized physically, electronically, graphically, 24photographically, or in writing. "Trade secret" also includes, 25irrespective of novelty, invention, patentability, the state 26of the prior art, and the level of skill in the business, art,   SB3992- 6 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1or field to which the subject matter pertains, the following 2elements:3        (1) a secret;4        (2) of value;5        (3) for use or in use by the business; and6        (4) of advantage to the business, or providing an 7    opportunity to obtain an advantage, over those who do not 8    know or use it when the owner thereof takes measures to 9    prevent it from becoming available to persons other than 10    those selected by the owner to have access thereto for 11    limited purposes. 12        "Traffic" means, as used in Section 30:13        (1) to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or 14    otherwise dispose of property; or15        (2) to buy, receive, possess, obtain control of, or 16    use property with the intent to sell, transfer, 17    distribute, dispense, or otherwise dispose of such 18    property. 19    Section 15. Gift and contract reporting requirements for 20countries of concern. 21    (a) Disclosure requirements for past gifts from countries 22of concern.23        (1) A State agency, political subdivision, institution 24    of K-12 education, or institution of higher education that 25    has received directly or indirectly a gift with any value   SB3992- 7 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    from a foreign source from a country of concern after 2    January 1, 2026 shall disclose such gifts to the Executive 3    Inspector General by March 1, 2026:4        (2) Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential 5    under State or federal law, such disclosure shall include 6    the date of the gift, the amount of the gift, the purpose 7    of the gift, the identification of the persons for whom 8    the gift is explicitly intended to benefit, any applicable 9    conditions, requirements, restrictions, or terms made part 10    of the gift, the name and country of residence or domicile 11    of the foreign source, the name and mailing address of the 12    disclosing entity, and, as applicable, the date of 13    termination of the gift.14        (3) The Executive Inspector General shall maintain a 15    public web portal to disclose information on past gifts 16    from countries of concern.17        (4) Under this subsection, a gift received from a 18    foreign source through an intermediary or affiliate 19    organization shall be considered an indirect gift to the 20    State agency, political subdivision, institution of K-12 21    education, or institution of higher education and is 22    subject to the disclosure process described in this 23    subsection.24        (5) Upon the request of the Governor, the President of 25    the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of 26    Representatives, the Executive Inspector General must   SB3992- 8 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    inspect or audit a past gift or gift agreement. 2    (b) Approval requirements for future gifts from countries 3of concern.4        (1) A State agency, political subdivision, institution 5    of K-12 education, or institution of higher education that 6    has been offered directly or indirectly a gift with any 7    value from a foreign source from a country of concern 8    after January 1, 2026 shall disclose such gift. State 9    agencies and other political subdivisions, including 10    institutions of K-12 education and institutions of higher 11    education, shall disclose such gifts to the Executive 12    Inspector General before accepting such gifts.13        (2) Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential 14    under State or federal law, such disclosure shall include 15    the date of the gift, the amount of the gift, the purpose 16    of the gift, the identification of the persons for whom 17    the gift is explicitly intended to benefit, any applicable 18    conditions, requirements, restrictions, or terms made part 19    of the gift, the name and country of residence or domicile 20    of the foreign source, the name and mailing address of the 21    disclosing entity, and, as applicable, the date of 22    termination of the gift.23        (3) Within 30 days after receiving the disclosure of 24    the proposed gift, the Executive Inspector General shall 25    issue a final decision to the relevant State agency, 26    political subdivision, institution of K-12 education, or   SB3992- 9 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    institution of higher education on whether and under what 2    conditions the relevant State agency, political 3    subdivision, institution of K-12 education, or institution 4    of higher education may accept the gift as follows:5            (A) The Executive Inspector General shall develop 6        disclosure forms, rules, and procedures for deciding 7        upon whether to allow a State agency, political 8        subdivision, institution of K-12 education, or 9        institution of higher education to accept gifts from 10        countries of concern.11            (B) The Executive Inspector General shall maintain 12        a public web portal disclosing proposed and accepted 13        gifts from countries of concern described in this 14        Section, along with the Executive Inspector General's 15        final decision on whether to allow the relevant State 16        agency, political subdivision, institution of K-12 17        education, or institution of higher education to 18        accept the gift.19        (4) Under this subsection, a gift received from a 20    foreign source through an intermediary shall be considered 21    an indirect gift with the State agency, political 22    subdivision, institution of K-12 education, or institution 23    of higher education and is subject to the approval process 24    described in this subsection.25        (5) Upon the request of the Governor, the President of 26    the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of   SB3992- 10 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    Representatives, the Executive Inspector General must 2    inspect or audit a gift or gift agreement. 3    (c) Disclosure requirements for past contracts from 4countries of concern5        (1) A State agency, political subdivision, institution 6    of K-12 education, or institution of higher education that 7    has entered into directly or indirectly a contract with 8    any value from a foreign source from a country of concern 9    before January 1, 2026 shall disclose such contracts to 10    the Executive Inspector General by March 1, 2026.11        (2) Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential 12    under State or federal law, such disclosure shall include 13    the date of the contract, the amount of the contract, the 14    purpose of the contract, the identification of the persons 15    for whom the contract is explicitly intended to benefit, 16    any applicable conditions, requirements, restrictions, or 17    terms made part of the contract, a copy of the contract, 18    the name and country of residence or domicile of the 19    foreign source, the name and mailing address of the 20    disclosing entity, and, as applicable, the date of 21    termination of the contract.22        (3) Under this subsection, a contract entered into 23    with a foreign source through an intermediary or affiliate 24    organization shall be considered an indirect contract to 25    the State agency, political subdivision, institution of 26    K-12 education, or institution of higher education and is   SB3992- 11 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    subject to the disclosure process described in this 2    subsection.3        (4) The Executive Inspector General shall maintain a 4    public web portal to disclose information on past proposed 5    and entered into contracts from countries of concern.6        (5) Upon the request of the Governor, the President of 7    the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of 8    Representatives, the Executive Inspector General must 9    inspect or audit a past contract. 10    (d) Approval requirements for future contracts from 11countries of concern12        (1) A State agency, political subdivision, institution 13    of K-12 education, or institution of higher education that 14    has been offered or has proposed directly or indirectly a 15    contract with any value from or with a foreign source from 16    a country of concern after January 1, 2026 shall disclose 17    such proposed contract to the Executive Inspector General 18    before entering into such contract.19        (2) Unless otherwise prohibited or deemed confidential 20    under State or federal law, such disclosure shall include 21    the date of the gift, the amount of the gift, the purpose 22    of the gift, the identification of the persons for whom 23    the gift is explicitly intended to benefit, any applicable 24    conditions, requirements, restrictions, or terms made part 25    of the gift, the name and country of residence or domicile 26    of the foreign source, the name and mailing address of the   SB3992- 12 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    disclosing entity, and, as applicable, the date of 2    termination of the gift.3        (3) Within 30 days of receiving the disclosure of the 4    proposed gift, the Executive Inspector General shall issue 5    a final decision to the relevant State agency, political 6    subdivision, institution of K-12 education, or institution 7    of higher education on whether and under what conditions 8    the relevant State agency, political subdivision, 9    institution of K-12 education, or institution of higher 10    education may accept the gift as follows:11            (A) The Executive Inspector General shall develop 12        disclosure forms, rules, and procedures for deciding 13        upon whether to allow State agencies or political 14        subdivisions to accept gifts from countries of 15        concern.16            (B) The Executive Inspector General shall maintain 17        a public web portal disclosing proposed gifts from 18        countries of concern and information on past proposed 19        and entered into contracts from countries of concern 20        described in this Section, along with the Executive 21        Inspector General's final decision on whether to allow 22        the relevant State agency or political subdivision to 23        accept the gift.24        (4) Under this subsection, a contract proposed from a 25    foreign source through an intermediary or affiliate 26    organization shall be considered an indirect contract with   SB3992- 13 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    the State agency, political subdivision, institution of 2    K-12 education, or institution of higher education and is 3    subject to the approval process described in this 4    subsection.5        (5) Upon the request of the Governor, the President of 6    the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of 7    Representatives, the Executive Inspector General must 8    inspect or audit a contract agreement. 9    (e) Enforcement, penalties, and rewards.10        (1) Upon receiving a referral from a compliance 11    officer of a State agency, political subdivision, 12    institution of K-12 education, or institution of higher 13    education or a sworn complaint based upon substantive 14    information and reasonable belief, the Executive Inspector 15    General must investigate an allegation of violation of 16    this Act. The Executive Inspector General may request 17    records relevant to a reasonable suspicion of a violation 18    of this Act. The entity with whom records were requested 19    must provide the required records within 10 days after 20    such request or at a later time agreed to by the 21    investigating State agency, political subdivision, 22    institution of K-12 education, or institution of higher 23    education.24        (2) Except as provided by paragraph (4), failure to 25    make a disclosure required under this Act or failure to 26    provide records requested under paragraph (1) constitutes   SB3992- 14 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    a civil violation punishable upon a final administrative 2    finding with a civil penalty of $10,000 for a first 3    violation or $20,000 for a subsequent violation. The 4    Executive Inspector General may assess the penalty after a 5    hearing after notice to the State agency, political 6    subdivision, institution of K-12 education, or institution 7    of higher education with an opportunity of the agency, 8    political subdivision, or institution to be heard. The 9    Attorney General may bring an action in circuit court to 10    enforce a civil penalty assessed under this paragraph. If 11    the State is the prevailing party, the State is entitled 12    to costs and reasonable attorney's fees.13        (3) In addition to a civil penalty assessed under 14    paragraph (2), a final order determining a violation by 15    the Executive Inspector General must include a 16    determination of the identity of the officer responsible 17    for acceptance of the undisclosed gift. Such order must 18    also include a referral by the Executive Inspector General 19    to the Governor or other officer authorized to suspend or 20    remove from public office the officer responsible for 21    acceptance of the undisclosed gift. A copy of such 22    referral must be provided to the President of the Senate 23    and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for 24    oversight of such suspension and removal authority. 25        (4) An institution of K-12 education or an institution 26    of higher education that knowingly, willfully, or   SB3992- 15 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    negligently fails to disclose the information required by 2    this subsection shall be subject to a civil penalty of 3    105% of the amount of the undisclosed gift or contract, 4    payable only from non-State funds of the institution of 5    K-12 education or institution of higher education or the 6    affiliate organization that received such gift. The 7    recovered funds must be deposited into the General Revenue 8    Fund. The Executive Inspector General may enforce this 9    subsection and impose the civil penalty as provided in 10    paragraph (2). 11        (5) A whistleblower who reports an undisclosed foreign 12    gift or contract to the Executive Inspector General may 13    also report such undisclosed gift or contract to the 14    Attorney General or a State agency, political subdivision, 15    institution of K-12 education, or institution of higher 16    education and retain whistleblower protection under the 17    Whistleblower Act or State Officials and Employees Ethics 18    Act, as applicable. Such whistleblower shall be entitled 19    to receive a reward in the amount of 25% of any penalty 20    recovered by the Executive Inspector General or the 21    Attorney General under this subsection. The Executive 22    Inspector General or the Attorney General may incur 23    expenditures to provide such reward from the penalty 24    recovery. The reward may be paid through an intermediate 25    attorney or trustee designated by the whistleblower. 26    (f) Information reported under subsection (a) is not   SB3992- 16 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1confidential or exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of 2Information Act, except as otherwise provided by law, 3including laws protecting trade secrets.4    (g) The Executive Inspector General may adopt rules to 5implement this Section.  6    Section 20. International cultural agreements and student 7associations within educational institutions.8    (a) International cultural agreements and student 9associations within institutions of K-12 education or 10institutions of higher education are restricted as follows:11        (1) An institution of K-12 education or institution of 12    higher education may not participate in a cultural 13    exchange agreement with a foreign source from a country of 14    concern, or an entity controlled by a country of concern, 15    that:16            (A) constrains the freedom of contract of such 17        public entity;18            (B) allows the curricula or values of a program in 19        the State to be directed, controlled, or influenced by 20        the country of concern; or21            (C) promotes an agenda detrimental to the safety 22        or security of Illinois, its residents, or the United 23        States. 24        (2) Prior to the execution of a cultural exchange 25    agreement with a foreign source from a country of concern,   SB3992- 17 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    the substance of the agreement shall be shared with 2    federal agencies concerned with protecting national 3    security or enforcing trade sanctions, embargoes, or other 4    restrictions under federal law. If a federal agency 5    provides information suggesting that such an agreement 6    promotes an agenda detrimental to the safety or security 7    of Illinois, the United States, or its residents, the 8    institution of K-12 education or institution of higher 9    education may not enter into the agreement. 10        (3) Prior to the execution of a cultural exchange 11    agreement with a foreign source from a country of concern, 12    the substance of the agreement shall be shared with the 13    Executive Inspector General. If the Executive Inspector 14    General provides information suggesting that such an 15    agreement promotes an agenda detrimental to the safety or 16    security of Illinois, the United States, or its residents, 17    the institution of K-12 education or institution of higher 18    education may not enter into the agreement. 19        (4) Each institution of higher education shall submit 20    the information required in paragraph (5) to each 21    institution's board and each institution of K-12 education 22    shall submit the information required in paragraph (5) to 23    the State Board of Education, respectively, by July 1, 24    2026, and on each July 1 thereafter. 25        (5) By December 1, 2026, and each December 1 26    thereafter, the State Board of Higher Education, the   SB3992- 18 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    Illinois Community College Board, and the State Board of 2    Education, respectively, shall submit a report to the 3    Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 4    the House of Representatives relating to partnerships and 5    agreements of institutions of K-12 education and 6    institutions of higher education made with educational 7    institutions or other institutions based in countries of 8    concern. At a minimum, the report must include the 9    following information for the previous fiscal year: 10            (A) Data reflecting a grant program, agreement, 11        partnership, or contract between an institution of 12        higher education and a college, university, or entity 13        that is based in or controlled by a country of concern 14        or foreign principal. 15            (B) Data reflecting an office, campus, or physical 16        location used or maintained by an institution of 17        higher education in a country of concern or foreign 18        principal.19            (C) The date on which a grant program, agreement, 20        partnership, or contract reported pursuant to 21        subparagraph (A) is expected to terminate. 22        (6) No students' or scholars' association affiliated 23    with an institution of K-12 education or an institution of 24    higher education may accept a gift or grant from a foreign 25    source from a country of concern or enter into a contract 26    or agreement with a foreign source from a country of   SB3992- 19 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    concern, subject to the following: 2            (A) The institution of K-12 education or 3        institution of higher education must end any 4        affiliation with the student or scholars' association 5        if the student or scholars' association violates this 6        paragraph (6).7            (B) Member dues or fees received are not a gift or 8        grant from a foreign source from a country of concern.9    (b) The State Board of Higher Education, the Illinois 10Community College Board, and the State Board of Education 11shall adopt rules to administer this Section.  12    Section 25. Higher education research; foreign travel 13screening. 14    (a) Screening requirements and disclosure. 15        (1) Each institute of higher education or affiliate 16    organization that has a research budget of $10,000,000 or 17    more must screen applicants seeking employment in research 18    or research-related support positions, graduate and 19    undergraduate students applying for research or 20    research-related support positions, and applicants for 21    positions of visiting researcher who are citizens of a 22    foreign country and who are not permanent residents of the 23    United States, or who are citizens and permanent residents 24    of the United States who have an affiliation with an 25    institution or program, or at least one year of prior   SB3992- 20 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    employment or training, with the exception of employment 2    or training by the agency of the United States government, 3    in a country of concern. Such screening is required prior 4    to interviewing such applicants or offering to such an 5    applicant a position of employment or of visiting 6    researcher. At the discretion of the university or entity, 7    other applicants for such positions may be screened. 8        (2) In addition to satisfying all employment and 9    enrollment qualifications imposed by federal law, the 10    Board of Governors or governing board of the applicable 11    entity must require the following of applicants included 12    in paragraph (1):13            (A) A foreign applicant must submit a complete 14        copy of the applicant's passport and most recently 15        submitted Online Nonimmigrant Visa Application 16        (DS-160). After extraction and submission of all 17        information relevant to the requirements of this 18        Section, a university or entity may destroy or return 19        the copy of the DS-160 submitted by an applicant to the 20        applicant. 21            (B) All applicants described in paragraph (1) must 22        submit: 23                (i) a complete resume and curriculum vitae, 24            including every institution of higher education 25            attended; 26                (ii) all previous employment since the   SB3992- 21 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1            applicant's eighteenth birthday; 2                (iii) a list of all published material for 3            which the applicant received credit as an author, 4            a researcher, or otherwise to which the applicant 5            contributed significant research, writing, or 6            editorial support; 7                (iv) a list of the applicant's current and 8            pending research funding from any source, 9            including funder, amount, applicant's role on the 10            project, and brief description of the research;11                (v) a full disclosure of nonuniversity 12            professional activities, including an affiliation 13            with an institution or program in a country of 14            concern; and15                (vi) for applicants who have been continually 16            employed or enrolled in a postsecondary education 17            institution in the United States for 20 years or 18            more, the resume may include employment history 19            before the most recent 20 years.20        (3) The president or chief administrative officer of 21    the institute of higher education or affiliate 22    organization shall designate a research integrity office 23    to review all materials required in paragraph (2) and take 24    reasonable steps to verify all attendance, employment, 25    publications, and contributions listed in the application 26    required in paragraph (2). Reasonable steps include   SB3992- 22 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    searching public databases for research publications and 2    presentations and public conflict of interest records to 3    identify a research publication or presentation that may 4    have been omitted from the application, contacting all 5    employers of the most recent 10 years to verify 6    employment, contacting all institutions of higher 7    education attended to verify enrollment and educational 8    progress, searching public listings of persons subject to 9    sanctions or restrictions under federal law, submitting 10    the applicant's name and other identifying information to 11    the Federal Bureau of Investigation or a federal agency 12    reasonably willing to scrutinize such applicant for 13    national security or counterespionage purposes, and any 14    other steps deemed appropriate to the office. The 15    institute of higher education or affiliate organization 16    may also direct the office to approve applicants for hire 17    based on a risk-based determination considering the nature 18    of the research and the background and ongoing 19    affiliations of the applicant. 20        (4) The requirements of this Section must be completed 21    before interviewing or offering a position to an 22    individual described in paragraph (1) in a research or 23    research-related support position and before granting such 24    individual any access to research data or activities or 25    other sensitive data. An applicant who must be screened 26    under this Section may not be employed in a research or   SB3992- 23 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    research-related support position if he or she fails to 2    disclose a substantial educational, employment, or 3    research-related activity or publication or presentation 4    at the time of submitting an application required in 5    paragraph (2) unless the department head, or a designee, 6    certifies in writing the substance of the nondisclosure 7    and the reasons for disregarding such failure to disclose. 8    A copy of such certification must be kept in the 9    investigative file of the Executive Inspector General and 10    must be submitted to the nearest Federal Bureau of 11    Investigation field office.12        (5) The Executive Inspector General must report to the 13    nearest Federal Bureau of Investigation field office, and 14    to any law enforcement agency designated by the Governor, 15    and to the governing board of the institution of higher 16    education or affiliate organization described in paragraph 17    (1), the identity of the applicant who was rejected for 18    employment based on the scrutiny required by this Section 19    or other risk-based screening.20        (6) By December 31, 2026, the Executive Inspector 21    General, the State Board of Education, State Board of 22    Higher Education, and the Illinois Community College Board 23    must perform an operation audit regarding the 24    implementation of this Section. 25    (b) International travel approval and monitoring program. 26By December 31, 2026, each institution of higher education or   SB3992- 24 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1affiliate organization that has a research budget of 2$10,000,000 or more must establish an international travel 3approval and monitoring program. The program must require 4pre-approval and screening by a research integrity office 5designated by the president or chief administrative officer of 6the institution of higher education or affiliate organization 7for an employment-related foreign travel and 8employment-related foreign activities engaged in by all 9faculty, researchers, and research department staff. Such 10requirement shall be in addition to any other travel approval 11process applicable to the institution of higher education or 12affiliate.13    (c) Pre-approval requirements. 14        (1) Pre-approval by the research integrity office must 15    be based on the applicant's review and acknowledgment of 16    guidance published by the employing institution of higher 17    education or affiliate organization which relates to 18    countries of concern, countries under sanction, or other 19    restrictions or designations imposed by the State or the 20    United States government; including any federal licensing 21    requirements; customs rules; export controls; restrictions 22    on taking university or entity property, including 23    intellectual property, abroad; restrictions on 24    presentations, teaching, and interactions with foreign 25    colleagues; and other subjects important to the research 26    and academic integrity of the institution of higher   SB3992- 25 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    education. 2        (2) Pre-approval must be based on the binding 3    commitment of the individual traveler not to violate the 4    institution of higher education's or affiliate 5    organization's limitations on travel and activities abroad 6    and to obey all applicable federal laws. 7    (d) Record maintenance. The institution of higher 8education or affiliate organization must maintain records of 9all foreign travel requests and approvals; expenses reimbursed 10by the university or affiliate organization during such 11travel, including for travel, food, and lodging; and payments 12and honoraria received during such travel and activities, 13including for travel, food, and lodging. The institution of 14higher education must also keep records of the purpose of the 15travel and any records related to the foreign activity review. 16Such records must be retained for at least 3 years or any 17longer period of time required by any other applicable State 18or federal law. 19    (e) Annual report. An institution of higher education or 20affiliate must provide an annual report of foreign travel to 21countries of concern listing individual travelers, foreign 22locations visited, and foreign institutions visited to the 23governing board of the applicable entity. 24    (f) Operational audit. By December 31, 2026, the Executive 25Inspector General, the State Board of Education, State Board 26of Higher Education, or the Illinois Community College Board   SB3992- 26 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1must perform an operational audit regarding the implementation 2of this Section.  3    Section 30. Research Partnerships. 4    (a) Subject to the approval of the State Board of Higher 5Education and Illinois Community College Board, an institution 6of higher education shall only enter into a new or renew an 7existing academic partnership with an academic or research 8institution located in a country of concern if the institution 9of higher education maintains sufficient structural safeguards 10to protect the institution of higher education's intellectual 11property, the security of the State of Illinois, and the 12national security interests of the United States. The State 13Board of Higher Education and Illinois Community College Board 14shall only approve an institution of higher education's 15partnership if the institution's board, in consultation with 16the Attorney General, determines the partnership meets the 17safeguard requirements prescribed under this Section. The 18safeguard requirements shall include, at a minimum, all of the 19following:20        (1) compliance with all federal requirements, 21    including the requirements of federal research sponsors 22    and federal export control agencies, including regulations 23    regarding international traffic in arms and export 24    administration regulations, and economic and trade 25    sanctions administered by the federal Office of Foreign   SB3992- 27 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    Assets Control;2        (2) annual formal institution-level programs for 3    faculty on conflicts of interest and conflicts of 4    commitment; and5        (3) a formalized foreign visitor process and uniform 6    visiting scholar agreement.7    (b) The State Board of Higher Education and Illinois 8Community College Board, in consultation with the Attorney 9General, may reject or terminate a research partnership 10between an institution of higher education and an academic or 11research institution located in a country of concern at any 12time and for any purpose.  13    Section 35. Intellectual property protections. 14    (a) Prohibitions.15        (1) It is unlawful for a person to willfully and 16    without authorization obtain or use or attempt to obtain 17    or use a trade secret with the intent to either 18    temporarily or permanently:19            (A) deprive or withhold from the owner thereof the 20        control or benefit of a trade secret; or21            (B) appropriate a trade secret to the person's own 22        use or to the use of another person not entitled to the 23        trade secret. 24    (b) Penalties.25        (1) A person who violates subsection (a) commits theft   SB3992- 28 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    of a trade secret, a Class X felony.2        (2) A person who traffics in or attempts to traffic in 3    a trade secret that the person knows or should know was 4    obtained or used without authorization commits trafficking 5    in trade secrets, a Class X felony.6        (3) Whenever a person is charged with a violation of 7    paragraph (1) or (2) that was committed with the intent to 8    benefit a foreign government, a foreign agent, or a 9    foreign instrumentality, the offense for which the person 10    is charged shall be classified as follows:11            (A) In the case of theft of a trade secret, a Class 12        X felony.13            (B) In the case of trafficking in trade secrets, a 14        Class X felony. 15    Section 90. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 16gifts and contracts from foreign countries of concern in a 17manner inconsistent with this Act. This Act is a limitation 18under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 19Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule 20units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 21    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 22severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 23    Section 900. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act   SB3992- 29 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1is amended by changing Section 20-10 as follows: 2    (5 ILCS 430/20-10)3    Sec. 20-10. Offices of Executive Inspectors General. 4    (a) Five independent Offices of the Executive Inspector 5General are created, one each for the Governor, the Attorney 6General, the Secretary of State, the Comptroller, and the 7Treasurer. Each Office shall be under the direction and 8supervision of an Executive Inspector General and shall be a 9fully independent office with separate appropriations.10    (b) The Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, 11Comptroller, and Treasurer shall each appoint an Executive 12Inspector General, without regard to political affiliation and 13solely on the basis of integrity and demonstrated ability. 14Appointments shall be made by and with the advice and consent 15of the Senate by three-fifths of the elected members 16concurring by record vote. Any nomination not acted upon by 17the Senate within 60 session days of the receipt thereof shall 18be deemed to have received the advice and consent of the 19Senate. If, during a recess of the Senate, there is a vacancy 20in an office of Executive Inspector General, the appointing 21authority shall make a temporary appointment until the next 22meeting of the Senate when the appointing authority shall make 23a nomination to fill that office. No person rejected for an 24office of Executive Inspector General shall, except by the 25Senate's request, be nominated again for that office at the   SB3992- 30 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1same session of the Senate or be appointed to that office 2during a recess of that Senate.3    Nothing in this Article precludes the appointment by the 4Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, Comptroller, 5or Treasurer of any other inspector general required or 6permitted by law. The Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of 7State, Comptroller, and Treasurer each may appoint an existing 8inspector general as the Executive Inspector General required 9by this Article, provided that such an inspector general is 10not prohibited by law, rule, jurisdiction, qualification, or 11interest from serving as the Executive Inspector General 12required by this Article. An appointing authority may not 13appoint a relative as an Executive Inspector General. 14    Each Executive Inspector General shall have the following 15qualifications:16        (1) has not been convicted of any felony under the 17    laws of this State, another State, or the United States;18        (2) has earned a baccalaureate degree from an 19    institution of higher education; and20        (3) has 5 or more years of cumulative service (A) with 21    a federal, State, or local law enforcement agency, at 22    least 2 years of which have been in a progressive 23    investigatory capacity; (B) as a federal, State, or local 24    prosecutor; (C) as a senior manager or executive of a 25    federal, State, or local agency; (D) as a member, an 26    officer, or a State or federal judge; or (E) representing   SB3992- 31 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    any combination of items (A) through (D). 2    The term of each initial Executive Inspector General shall 3commence upon qualification and shall run through June 30, 42008. The initial appointments shall be made within 60 days 5after the effective date of this Act.6    After the initial term, each Executive Inspector General 7shall serve for 5-year terms commencing on July 1 of the year 8of appointment and running through June 30 of the fifth 9following year. An Executive Inspector General may be 10reappointed to one or more subsequent terms.11    A vacancy occurring other than at the end of a term shall 12be filled by the appointing authority only for the balance of 13the term of the Executive Inspector General whose office is 14vacant.15    Terms shall run regardless of whether the position is 16filled.17    (c) The Executive Inspector General appointed by the 18Attorney General shall have jurisdiction over the Attorney 19General and all officers and employees of, and vendors and 20others doing business with, State agencies within the 21jurisdiction of the Attorney General. The Executive Inspector 22General appointed by the Secretary of State shall have 23jurisdiction over the Secretary of State and all officers and 24employees of, and vendors and others doing business with, 25State agencies within the jurisdiction of the Secretary of 26State. The Executive Inspector General appointed by the   SB3992- 32 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1Comptroller shall have jurisdiction over the Comptroller and 2all officers and employees of, and vendors and others doing 3business with, State agencies within the jurisdiction of the 4Comptroller. The Executive Inspector General appointed by the 5Treasurer shall have jurisdiction over the Treasurer and all 6officers and employees of, and vendors and others doing 7business with, State agencies within the jurisdiction of the 8Treasurer. The Executive Inspector General appointed by the 9Governor shall have jurisdiction over (i) the Governor, (ii) 10the Lieutenant Governor, (iii) all officers and employees of, 11and vendors and others doing business with, executive branch 12State agencies under the jurisdiction of the Executive Ethics 13Commission and not within the jurisdiction of the Attorney 14General, the Secretary of State, the Comptroller, or the 15Treasurer, (iv) all board members and employees of the 16Regional Transit Boards and all vendors and others doing 17business with the Regional Transit Boards, and (v) all board 18members and employees of the Regional Development Authorities 19and all vendors and others doing business with the Regional 20Development Authorities, and (vi) entities to which the 21Executive Inspector General was given jurisdiction over in the 22Research, Education, and Government Operations Protection Act.23    The jurisdiction of each Executive Inspector General is to 24investigate allegations of fraud, waste, abuse, mismanagement, 25misconduct, nonfeasance, misfeasance, malfeasance, or 26violations of this Act or violations of other related laws and   SB3992- 33 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1rules. 2    Each Executive Inspector General shall have jurisdiction 3over complainants in violation of subsection (e) of Section 420-63 for disclosing a summary report prepared by the 5respective Executive Inspector General. 6    (d) The compensation for each Executive Inspector General 7shall be determined by the Executive Ethics Commission and 8shall be provided from appropriations made to the Comptroller 9for this purpose. For terms of office beginning on or after 10July 1, 2023, each Executive Inspector General shall receive, 11on July 1 of each year, beginning on July 1, 2024, an increase 12in salary based on a cost of living adjustment as authorized by 13Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 86th General Assembly. 14Subject to Section 20-45 of this Act, each Executive Inspector 15General has full authority to organize his or her Office of the 16Executive Inspector General, including the employment and 17determination of the compensation of staff, such as deputies, 18assistants, and other employees, as appropriations permit. A 19separate appropriation shall be made for each Office of 20Executive Inspector General. 21    (e) No Executive Inspector General or employee of the 22Office of the Executive Inspector General may, during his or 23her term of appointment or employment:24        (1) become a candidate for any elective office;25        (2) hold any other elected or appointed public office 26    except for appointments on governmental advisory boards or   SB3992- 34 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1    study commissions or as otherwise expressly authorized by 2    law;3        (3) be actively involved in the affairs of any 4    political party or political organization; or5        (4) advocate for the appointment of another person to 6    an appointed or elected office or position or actively 7    participate in any campaign for any elective office.8    In this subsection an appointed public office means a 9position authorized by law that is filled by an appointing 10authority as provided by law and does not include employment 11by hiring in the ordinary course of business. 12    (e-1) No Executive Inspector General or employee of the 13Office of the Executive Inspector General may, for one year 14after the termination of his or her appointment or employment:15        (1) become a candidate for any elective office;16        (2) hold any elected public office; or17        (3) hold any appointed State, county, or local 18    judicial office. 19    (e-2) The requirements of item (3) of subsection (e-1) may 20be waived by the Executive Ethics Commission.21    (f) An Executive Inspector General may be removed only for 22cause and may be removed only by the appointing constitutional 23officer. At the time of the removal, the appointing 24constitutional officer must report to the Executive Ethics 25Commission the justification for the removal.26(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23;   SB3992- 35 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1103-517, eff. 8-11-23.) 2    Section 905. The Whistleblower Act is amended by changing 3Section 15 as follows: 4    (740 ILCS 174/15)5    Sec. 15. Retaliation for certain disclosures prohibited. 6    (a) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 7employee who discloses or threatens to disclose to a public 8body conducting an investigation, or in a court, an 9administrative hearing, or any other proceeding initiated by a 10public body, information related to an activity, policy, or 11practice of the employer, where the employee has a good faith 12belief that the activity, policy, or practice (i) violates a 13State or federal law, rule, or regulation or (ii) poses a 14substantial and specific danger to employees, public health, 15or safety.16    (b) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 17employee for disclosing or threatening to disclose information 18to a government or law enforcement agency information related 19to an activity, policy, or practice of the employer, where the 20employee has a good faith belief that the activity, policy, or 21practice of the employer (i) violates a State or federal law, 22rule, or regulation or (ii) poses a substantial and specific 23danger to employees, public health, or safety.24    (c) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an   SB3992- 36 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b1employee for disclosing or threatening to disclose to any 2supervisor, principal officer, board member, or supervisor in 3an organization that has a contractual relationship with the 4employer who makes the employer aware of the disclosure, 5information related to an activity, policy, or practice of the 6employer if the employee has a good faith belief that the 7activity, policy, or practice (i) violates a State or federal 8law, rule, or regulation or (ii) poses a substantial and 9specific danger to employees, public health, or safety. 10    (d) An employer may not take retaliatory action against an 11employee for disclosing or threatening to disclose in good 12faith any violation of Section 5-10 of the Illinois Bivens 13Act. 14    (e) A State agency, political subdivision, institution of 15K-12 education, or institution of higher education, as those 16terms are defined in Section 10 of the Research, Education, 17and Government Operations Protection Act, may not retaliate 18against any person, whether or not that person is an employee 19of the agency, political subdivision, or institution, for 20disclosing information under the Research, Education, and 21Government Operations Protection Act if the employee has 22reasonable cause to believe that the information discloses a 23violation of State or federal law, rule, or regulation. 24(Source: P.A. 103-867, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 25104-440, eff. 12-9-25.) 26    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January   SB3992- 37 -LRB104 18741 BDA 32184 b11, 2027.